District of Columbia statutes.
26-634

Requirements for international banking corporation activities.

(a)

An international banking corporation may transact a banking business, or maintain in the District of Columbia an office for carrying on such business, or any part thereof, if the corporation has:

(1)

Been authorized by its charter to carry on a banking business and has complied with the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is chartered;

(2)

Furnished to the Department such proof as to the nature and character of its business and as to its financial condition as the Department may require;

(3)

Filed with the Department a certified copy of any information required to be supplied to the District of Columbia by a foreign corporation under § 29-101.99; and

(4)

Been licensed by the Department.

(b)

An international banking corporation may engage in representational and other activities in the District of Columbia, other than those specified in § 26-635, only as authorized in § 26-636.

(c)

Any person who establishes or maintains an office or transacts business in the District of Columbia in violation of this section shall be subject to the penalties imposed by § 26-103(g).

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-268, § 5, 48 DCR 1251

Section References

This section is referenced in § 26-635.